Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-702.1 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No public trust hospital license or main provider location under
a provider agreement with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services (CMS), as provided for under 42 C.F.R., Sections 489.1
through 489.18, shall be transferred from its current address to an
address greater than fifteen (15) miles away, if the public trust
hospital is located in a community with a population of fewer than
thirty thousand (30,000) residents, according to the latest Federal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2295 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Dece nnial Census. If a public trust hospital facility announces a
closure, before the closure of the facility, a mediator shall be
appointed. The municipality beneficiary of the public trust
hospital shall also appoint a mediator. The two mediators shall
appoint a mutually agreed-upon third mediator. The three mediators
shall agree upon a sales price for the hospital, in accordance with
appropriate due diligence and financial audits received from the
public trust hospital, if the hospital and the municipality cannot
agree without mediation. The hospital shall be transferred to the
beneficiary municipality if the beneficiary municipality is willing
to pay the agreed-upon purchase price set forth by the mediators and
has the appropriate staff identified to operate the hospital.
In the event the public trust hospital is sold to another
entity, the trustees of the hospital shall certify that they have
not entered into any agreement, formal or informal, with the
prospective owners of the hospital regarding any position, role, or
employment for themselves or their direct relatives, and they shall
also certify that they have not and will not receive any financial
benefit from the prospective owners, whether in-kind or otherwise.
In the event a public, third party, has been leasing the public
trust hospital and operating the public trust hospital under a
lease, upon termination of that lease, the hospital CMS provider
number shall revert back to the public trust hospital immediately

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2295 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

upon lease termination, in accordance with the provisions of 42
C.F.R., Section 489.18.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-702.2 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All public trust hospital trustees shall be required to complete
a trustee education program, approved in advance by a statewide
hospital organization, leading to certification as a Certified
Hospital Trustee by a statewide hospital organization approved by
the State Department of Health. Trustee education shall commence
within ninety (90) days of appointment to the office of trustees for
the public trust hospital.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
April 14, 2025 - DO PASS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2295 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)